testing/vro-tests.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../bin/vro-gen.hfstol
    Morph: ../bin/vro.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../bin/ivro.fst
    Morph: ../bin/vro.fst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - altri: # Noun 'altar' - full paradigm
     .altri+N+Sg+Nom: altri
     .altri+N+Sg+Gen: altri
     .altri+N+Sg+Part: altrit
     .altri+N+Sg+Ill: altrihe

     .altri+N+Pl+Nom: altriq
     .altri+N+Pl+Gen: altridõ
     .altri+N+Pl+Part: altriid
     .altri+N+Pl+Ill: [altriihe, altrihe]
     .altri+N+Pl+All: [altriilõ, altrilõ]


  Verb - võtma: # Verb "võtma" 'to take' - full paradigm
     .võtma+V+Pred+Ind+Prs+1Sg: võta
     .võtma+V+Pred+Ind+Prs+2Sg: võtat
     .võtma+V+Pred+Ind+Prs+3Sg: võtt
     .võtma+V+Pred+Ind+Prs+1Pl: võtamiq
     .võtma+V+Pred+Ind+Prs+2Pl: võtatiq
     .võtma+V+Pred+Ind+Prs+3Pl: võtvaq

     .võtma+V+Pred+Ind+Prt+1Sg: võti
     .võtma+V+Pred+Ind+Prt+2Sg: võtit
     .võtma+V+Pred+Ind+Prt+3Sg: võtt'
     .võtma+V+Pred+Ind+Prt+1Pl: võtimiq
     .võtma+V+Pred+Ind+Prt+2Pl: võtitiq
     .võtma+V+Pred+Ind+Prt+3Pl: võtiq

     .võtma+V+Pred+Imprt+2Sg: võtaq
     .võtma+V+Pred+Imprt+1Pl: võtkõq
     .võtma+V+Pred+Imprt+2Pl: võtkõq

     .võtma+V+Pred+Jus: võtkuq
     .võtma+V+Pred+Cond: võtasiq
     .võtma+V+Pred+Cond: võtnuq

     .võtma+V+Pred+Quot+Prs: võttõv
     .võtma+V+Pred+Quot+Prs: võtvat

     .võtma+V+Sup+Ill: võtma
     .võtma+V+Sup+Ine: võtman
     .võtma+V+Sup+Ela: võtmast
     .võtma+V+Sup+Abe: võtmaldaq

     .võtma+V+Ptc: võtnuq
     .võtma+V+Inf: võttaq
     .võtma+V+Ger: võttõn
